Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-103
Authority for daily maintenance, minor repairs, custodial duties, and operations; buildings to which applicable.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall have the authority to direct all daily maintenance, minor repairs, custodial duties, and operations of a public building under the administration of the Department of Health and Human Services where a juvenile resides who is committed to the Office of Juvenile Services for placement at a youth rehabilitation and treatment center.

Laws 2020, LB1188, § 13.